test/src/gt-norm-yamls/numerals_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Numerals.

Tests:
  Num - akta: # 
    akta+Num+Sg+Nom: akta
    akta+Num+Sg+Ela: [avtas, åvtås]
    akta+Num+Sg+Ill: aktaj
    akta+Num+Sg+Par: [avtat, åvtåt]
    akta+Num+Sg+Ine: [avtan, åvtån]
    akta+Num+Pl+Ill: [avtajda, åvtåjda]
    akta+Num+Pl+Ela: [avtajs, åvtåjs]
    akta+Num+Ess: aktan
    akta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: akti

  Noun - guokta: #GUOKTA
    guokta+Num+Sg+Nom: [guokta, guokte]
    guokta+Num+Sg+Gen: guovte
    guokta+Num+Sg+Acc: [guokta, guovtev]
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ill: guoktaj
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr: guovte
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ine: guovten
    guokta+Num+Sg+Ela: guovtes
    guokta+Num+Sg+Com: guovtijn
    guokta+Num+Ess: [guoktan, guokten]
    guokta+Num+Pl+Nom: guovte
    guokta+Num+Pl+Acc: guovtijt
    guokta+Num+Pl+Ill: guovtijda
    guokta+Num+Pl+Ine: guovtijn
    guokta+Num+Pl+Ela: guovtijs
    guokta+Num+Pl+Com: guovtij
    guokta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: guokti

  Noun - gålmmå: #GÅLMMÅ
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmå
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Gen: gålmå
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Acc: [gålmmå, gålmåv]
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ill: gålmmåj
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr: gålmå
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ine: gålmån
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Ela: gålmås
    gålmmå+Num+Sg+Com: gålmåjn
    gålmmå+Num+Ess: gålmmån
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Nom: gålmå
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Acc: gålmåjt
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Ill: gålmåjda
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Ine: gålmåjn
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Ela: gålmåjs
    gålmmå+Num+Pl+Com: gålmåj
    gålmmå+Num+Der/akti+Adv: gålmmi

  Num - giehtja: # 
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Nom: [giehtja, gietjav, gietja]
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Ela: gietjas
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Ill: giehtjaj
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Par: gietjat
    giehtja+Num+Sg+Ine: gietjan
    giehtja+Num+Pl+Ill: gietjajda
    giehtja+Num+Pl+Ela: gietjajs
    giehtja+Num+Ess: giehtjan
    giehtja+Num+Der/akti+Adv: giehttji
    


  Num - lågenanguokta: # MUORRA
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Nom: [lågenanguokta, lågenanguokte]
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Gen: lågenanguovte
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Acc: [lågenanguovtev, lågenanguokta]
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ine: lågenanguovten
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ela: lågenanguovtes
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Ill: lågenanguoktaj
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Com: lågenanguovtijn
    lågenanguokta+Num+Sg+Par: lågenanguovtet
    lågenanguokta+Num+Pl+Ill: lågenanguovtijda
    lågenanguokta+Num+Pl+Ela: lågenanguovtijs
    lågenanguokta+Num+Ess: [lågenanguokten,lågenanguoktan]
    lågenanguokta+Num+Der/akti+Adv: lågenanguokti
    
  Num - tjuohtegålmmå: # 
    tjuohtegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: tjuohtegålmmå    

  Num - vihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    vihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: vihttalåhkevihtta

  Num - gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta
 
  Num - gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkegålmmå: # 
    gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkegålmmå+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåtuvsánvihttatjuohteaktselåhkegålmmå

  Num - gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta: # 
    gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta+Num+Sg+Nom: gáktsalåhketuvsánguhttalåhkeakta


  Num - tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta: # 
    tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta+Num+Sg+Nom: tuvsánaktatjuohtevihttalåhkevihtta

  Num - lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguhtta: # 
    lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguhtta+Num+Sg+Nom: lågenangáktsatuvsánaktatjuohtegålmmålåhkeguhtta

  Num - gålmmåmillijárddaguoktalåhkeguoktamillijåvnnåguhttatuvsángáktsalåhkegáktsa: # 
    gålmmåmillijárddaguoktalåhkeguoktamillijåvnnåguhttatuvsángáktsalåhkegáktsa+Num+Sg+Nom: gålmmåmillijárddaguoktalåhkeguoktamillijåvnnåguhttatuvsángáktsalåhkegáktsa
